Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.837

Exceptional faculty awards—Established—Community and technical college faculty awards trust fund.

(1) The Washington community and technical college exceptional faculty awards program is established. The program shall be administered by the college board. The college faculty awards trust fund hereby created shall be administered by the state treasurer.

(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the community and technical college exceptional faculty awards program shall be deposited in the college faculty awards trust fund. At the request of the college board, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the local endowment fund of the college or its foundation. No appropriation is necessary for the expenditure of moneys from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used solely for the exceptional faculty awards program. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the college faculty awards trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 901; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 914; 2009 c 564 s 1803; 2003 c 129 s 2; 2002 c 371 s 902; 1993 c 87 s 1; 1991 sp.s. c 13 ss 108, 109; 1991 c 238 s 63; 1990 c 29 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9: "Except for sections 903 and 905 of this act which take effect July 1, 2012, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [December 20, 2011]." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 917.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Severability—1990 c 29: See note following RCW 28B.50.835.